Hawaii statutes.
§53-25 Application of other corporation
laws. All provisions of the general corporation laws, not inapplicable and
not inconsistent with the provisions of this part shall apply to redevelopment
corporations. If any action with respect to which the holders of income
debentures shall have the right to vote is proposed to be taken, then notice of
any meeting at which the action is proposed to be taken shall be given to the
holders in the same manner and to the same extent as if they were stockholders
entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, and any certificate filed
pursuant to law with the state director of commerce and consumer affairs with
respect to any action, whether taken with or without meeting, and any affidavit
required by law to be annexed to the certificate, shall contain the same
statements or recitals and the certificate shall be subscribed and
acknowledged, and the affidavit shall be made, in the same manner as if the
holders were stockholders holding shares of an additional class of stock
entitled to vote on the action or with respect to the proceedings provided for
in the certificate. [L 1949, c 379, §8; RL 1955, §143-24; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§15; am L 1963, c 114, §3; HRS §53-25; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124,
§17]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next